test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_VLONGVW_NoExtra_ikwe_gt-norm.yaml
     +Px3ikwe+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: oikweimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3ikwe+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: oikweimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3ikwe+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: oikweimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3ikwe+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: oikweimishiwaaibanan
     +Px3ikwe+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: oikweimishiwaaibanag
     +Px3ikwe+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: oikweimishiwaaibaning
     +Px3ikwe+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: oikweimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3ikwe+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: oikweimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3ikwe+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: oikweimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3ikwe+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: oikweimishiniibanan
     +Px3ikwe+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: oikweimishiniibanag
     +Px3ikwe+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: oikweimishiniibaning
     +Px3ikwe+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: oikweimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3ikwe+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: oikweimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3ikwe+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: oikweimishini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: ikweensimishinaanibanan
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: ikweensimishinaanibanag
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: ikweensimishinaanibaning
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: ikweensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: ikweensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: ikweensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: ikweensimishiwaaibanan
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: ikweensimishiwaaibanag
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: ikweensimishiwaaibaning
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: ikweensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: ikweensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: ikweensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: ikweensimishiniibanan
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: ikweensimishiniibanag
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: ikweensimishiniibaning
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: ikweensimishini***idig, idog***an
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: ikweensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: ikweensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: ikweenhimishinaanibanan
     ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: ikweenhimishinaanibanag
     ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: ikweenhimishinaanibaning
     ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: ikweenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: ikweenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: ikweenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: ikweenhimishiwaaibanan
     ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: ikweenhimishiwaaibanag
     ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: ikweenhimishiwaaibaning
     ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: ikweenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: ikweenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: ikweenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: ikweenhimishiniibanan
     ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: ikweenhimishiniibanag
     ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: ikweenhimishiniibaning
     ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: ikweenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: ikweenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: ikweenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     +Px1ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: niikweensimishinaanibanan
     +Px1ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: niikweensimishinaanibanag
     +Px1ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: niikweensimishinaanibaning
     +Px1ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: niikweensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px1ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: niikweensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: niikweensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: niikweensimishiwaaibanan
     +Px1ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: niikweensimishiwaaibanag
     +Px1ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: niikweensimishiwaaibaning
     +Px1ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: niikweensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px1ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: niikweensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: niikweensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: niikweensimishiniibanan
     +Px1ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: niikweensimishiniibanag
     +Px1ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: niikweensimishiniibaning
     +Px1ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: niikweensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px1ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: niikweensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: niikweensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: niikweenhimishinaanibanan
     +Px1ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: niikweenhimishinaanibanag
     +Px1ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: niikweenhimishinaanibaning
     +Px1ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: niikweenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px1ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: niikweenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: niikweenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: niikweenhimishiwaaibanan
     +Px1ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: niikweenhimishiwaaibanag
     +Px1ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: niikweenhimishiwaaibaning
     +Px1ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: niikweenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px1ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: niikweenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: niikweenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: niikweenhimishiniibanan
     +Px1ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: niikweenhimishiniibanag
     +Px1ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: niikweenhimishiniibaning
     +Px1ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: niikweenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px1ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: niikweenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: niikweenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: giikweensimishinaanibanan
     +Px2ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: giikweensimishinaanibanag
     +Px2ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: giikweensimishinaanibaning
     +Px2ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: giikweensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: giikweensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: giikweensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: giikweensimishiwaaibanan
     +Px2ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: giikweensimishiwaaibanag
     +Px2ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: giikweensimishiwaaibaning
     +Px2ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: giikweensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: giikweensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: giikweensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: giikweensimishiniibanan
     +Px2ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: giikweensimishiniibanag
     +Px2ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: giikweensimishiniibaning
     +Px2ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: giikweensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: giikweensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: giikweensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: giikweenhimishinaanibanan
     +Px2ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: giikweenhimishinaanibanag
     +Px2ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: giikweenhimishinaanibaning
     +Px2ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: giikweenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: giikweenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: giikweenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: giikweenhimishiwaaibanan
     +Px2ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: giikweenhimishiwaaibanag
     +Px2ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: giikweenhimishiwaaibaning
     +Px2ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: giikweenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: giikweenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: giikweenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: giikweenhimishiniibanan
     +Px2ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: giikweenhimishiniibanag
     +Px2ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: giikweenhimishiniibaning
     +Px2ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: giikweenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: giikweenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: giikweenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: oikweensimishinaanibanan
     +Px3ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: oikweensimishinaanibanag
     +Px3ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: oikweensimishinaanibaning
     +Px3ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: oikweensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: oikweensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: oikweensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: oikweensimishiwaaibanan
     +Px3ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: oikweensimishiwaaibanag
     +Px3ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: oikweensimishiwaaibaning
     +Px3ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: oikweensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: oikweensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: oikweensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: oikweensimishiniibanan
     +Px3ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: oikweensimishiniibanag
     +Px3ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: oikweensimishiniibaning
     +Px3ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: oikweensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: oikweensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: oikweensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: oikweenhimishinaanibanan
     +Px3ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: oikweenhimishinaanibanag
     +Px3ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: oikweenhimishinaanibaning
     +Px3ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: oikweenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: oikweenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: oikweenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: oikweenhimishiwaaibanan
     +Px3ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: oikweenhimishiwaaibanag
     +Px3ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: oikweenhimishiwaaibaning
     +Px3ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: oikweenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: oikweenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: oikweenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: oikweenhimishiniibanan
     +Px3ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: oikweenhimishiniibanag
     +Px3ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: oikweenhimishiniibaning
     +Px3ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: oikweenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: oikweenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: oikweenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     
